District of Columbia statutes.
29-305.26

Action by single and multiple voting groups.

(a)

If the articles of incorporation or this chapter provide for voting by a single voting group on a matter, action on that matter is taken when voted upon by that voting group as provided in § 29-305.25.

(b)

If the articles of incorporation or this chapter provide for voting by 2 or more voting groups on a matter, action on that matter is taken only when voted upon by each of those voting groups counted separately as provided in § 29-305.25. Action may be taken by one voting group on a matter even though no action is taken by another voting group entitled to vote on the matter.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720